test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VW_waawaatesi_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giwaawaatesiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giwaawaatesiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giwaawaatesiensimishiniibanan
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giwaawaatesiensimishiniibanag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giwaawaatesiensimishiniibaning
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giwaawaatesiensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giwaawaatesiensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giwaawaatesiensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giwaawaatesienhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giwaawaatesienhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giwaawaatesienhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giwaawaatesienhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giwaawaatesienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giwaawaatesienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giwaawaatesienhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giwaawaatesienhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giwaawaatesienhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giwaawaatesienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giwaawaatesienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giwaawaatesienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giwaawaatesienhimishiniibanan
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giwaawaatesienhimishiniibanag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giwaawaatesienhimishiniibaning
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giwaawaatesienhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giwaawaatesienhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giwaawaatesienhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: owaawaatesiensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: owaawaatesiensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: owaawaatesiensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: owaawaatesiensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: owaawaatesiensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: owaawaatesiensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: owaawaatesiensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: owaawaatesiensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: owaawaatesiensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: owaawaatesiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: owaawaatesiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: owaawaatesiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: owaawaatesiensimishiniibanan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: owaawaatesiensimishiniibanag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: owaawaatesiensimishiniibaning
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: owaawaatesiensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: owaawaatesiensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: owaawaatesiensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: owaawaatesienhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: owaawaatesienhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: owaawaatesienhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: owaawaatesienhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: owaawaatesienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: owaawaatesienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: owaawaatesienhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: owaawaatesienhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: owaawaatesienhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: owaawaatesienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: owaawaatesienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: owaawaatesienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: owaawaatesienhimishiniibanan
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: owaawaatesienhimishiniibanag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: owaawaatesienhimishiniibaning
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: owaawaatesienhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: owaawaatesienhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: owaawaatesienhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iwaawaatesiensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iwaawaatesiensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iwaawaatesiensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesiensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesiensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesiensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iwaawaatesiensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iwaawaatesiensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iwaawaatesiensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iwaawaatesiensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iwaawaatesiensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iwaawaatesiensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesiensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesiensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesiensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iwaawaatesienhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iwaawaatesienhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iwaawaatesienhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesienhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iwaawaatesienhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iwaawaatesienhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iwaawaatesienhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iwaawaatesienhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iwaawaatesienhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iwaawaatesienhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesienhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesienhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesienhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
